Nevada, session 83, AB341.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 118 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A landlord shall not refuse to rent or refuse to negotiate
for the rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a
dwelling to a corporation that rents a dwelling on behalf of a
person with a disability solely because the corporation provides
assistance in obtaining housing to a person with a disability.
2. If such a corporation applies for an available dwelling on
behalf of a person with a disability and the application is denied,
the landlord shall submit to the corporation, the Aging and
Disability Services Division of the Department of Health and
Human Services and the Office of the Ombudsman for Owners in
Common-Interest Communities and Condominium Hotels a
written explanation of the reasons for the denial within 7 days
after the denial.
Sec. 2. NRS 118.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.030 As used in NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 118.040 to 118.093, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 118.115 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.115 A tenant has a defense in a summary proceeding or
other action for possession of a dwelling if the landlord’s attempt to
terminate the tenancy or regain possession violates any provision of
-
*AB341*

– 3 –
NRS 118.010 to 118.120, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or the
Fair Housing Act of 1968, 42 U.S.C. §§ 3601 et seq.
Sec. 4. NRS 118.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.120 Any person may commence an action in any district
court in this state to enforce the provisions of NRS 118.100,
207.300, 207.310, 645.321 or 645C.480 or section 1 of this act not
less than 1 year after the date of the occurrence or termination of an
alleged violation of any of those provisions. If the court determines
that the provisions of any of those sections have been violated by
the defendant, and that the plaintiff has been injured thereby, it may
enjoin the defendant from continued violation or may take such
other affirmative action as may be appropriate, and, in the case of a
prevailing plaintiff, may award to the plaintiff actual damages,
punitive damages, court costs and a reasonable attorney’s fee.
Sec. 5. NRS 118A.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.510 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the landlord may not, in retaliation, terminate a tenancy, refuse to
renew a tenancy, increase rent or decrease essential items or services
required by the rental agreement or this chapter, or bring or threaten
to bring an action for possession if:
(a) The tenant has complained in good faith of a violation of a
building, housing or health code applicable to the premises and
affecting health or safety to a governmental agency charged with the
responsibility for the enforcement of that code;
(b) The tenant has complained in good faith to the landlord or a
law enforcement agency of a violation of this chapter or of a
specific statute that imposes a criminal penalty;
(c) The tenant has organized or become a member of a tenant’s
union or similar organization;
(d) A citation has been issued resulting from a complaint
described in paragraph (a);
(e) The tenant has instituted or defended against a judicial or
administrative proceeding or arbitration in which the tenant raised
an issue of compliance with the requirements of this chapter
respecting the habitability of dwelling units;
(f) The tenant has failed or refused to give written consent to a
regulation adopted by the landlord, after the tenant enters into the
rental agreement, which requires the landlord to wait until the
appropriate time has elapsed before it is enforceable against
the tenant;
(g) The tenant has complained in good faith to the landlord, a
government agency, an attorney, a fair housing agency or any other
appropriate body of a violation of NRS 118.010 to 118.120,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act or the Fair Housing Act of 1968,
-
*AB341*

– 4 –
42 U.S.C. §§ 3601 et seq., or has otherwise exercised rights which
are guaranteed or protected under those laws;
(h) The tenant or, if applicable, a cotenant or household
member, is a victim of domestic violence, harassment, sexual
assault or stalking or terminates a rental agreement pursuant to NRS
118A.345; or
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 118A.315, the tenant is
a federal worker, tribal worker, state worker or household member
of such a worker and the tenant pays rent during the time specified
in subsection 2 of NRS 118A.310. As used in this paragraph,
“household member” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 40.0025.
2. If the landlord violates any provision of subsection 1, the
tenant is entitled to the remedies provided in NRS 118A.390 and has
a defense in any retaliatory action by the landlord for possession.
3. A landlord who acts under the circumstances described in
subsection 1 does not violate that subsection if:
(a) The violation of the applicable building, housing or health
code of which the tenant complained was caused primarily by the
lack of reasonable care by the tenant, a member of his or her
household or other person on the premises with his or her consent;
(b) The tenancy is terminated with cause;
(c) A citation has been issued and compliance with the
applicable building, housing or health code requires alteration,
remodeling or demolition and cannot be accomplished unless the
tenant’s dwelling unit is vacant; or
(d) The increase in rent applies in a uniform manner to all
tenants.
 The maintenance of an action under this subsection does not
prevent the tenant from seeking damages or injunctive relief for the
landlord’s failure to comply with the rental agreement or maintain
the dwelling unit in a habitable condition as required by this chapter.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Cotenant” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 118A.345.
(b) “Domestic violence” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118A.345.
(c) “Harassment” means a violation of NRS 200.571.
(d) “Household member” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118A.345.
(e) “Sexual assault” means a violation of NRS 200.366.
(f) “Stalking” means a violation of NRS 200.575.
H
-
*AB341*